finnish.large.aff
   I N >	-N,MPIINNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPIINNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANIPA
   I N >	-N,MPINANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKO
   I N >	-N,MPINASIPA
   I N >	-N,MPINASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MPINASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MPINANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASSANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMASTANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALTANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLESIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLEMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMALLENNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIPA
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIPA
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSESIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSEMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMAKSENNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISSANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMISTANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAPA
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANSAPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEPA
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLAMMEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEPA
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILLANNEPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIPA
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIPA
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKINKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKAANKO
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIKOHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTASIPAHAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANSAKIN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANSAKAAN
   I N >	-N,MMILTANSAKO
